Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202577-4002
Definitions; where found.

For purposes of the Tobacco Products Tax Act, unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions found in sections 77-4002.01 to 77-4007 shall be used.

Laws 1987, LB 730, § 2;

Laws 2009, LB89, § 2;

Laws 2023, LB727, § 89;

Laws 2025, LB9, § 11.